Hawaii statutes.
§329-52 Administrative inspections. (a)
The administrator or any of the administrator's agents may make administrative
inspections of controlled premises upon presenting appropriate credentials to
the registrant or persons subject to parts III, IV, VIII, and IX of this
chapter or their agents in accordance with the following provisions:

(1) Inspections shall be at reasonable times and
within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner of controlled premises and
vehicles in which persons registered or exempted from registration requirements
under this chapter are permitted to hold, manufacture, compound, process, sell,
dispense, deliver, or otherwise dispose of any controlled substance or
regulated chemical designated under section 329-61 and all pertinent equipment,
finished and unfinished materials, containers, and labeling therein to
determine if this chapter is being violated;

(2) The administrator or any of the administrator's
agents shall have access to and may copy any and all records, books, logs, or
documents pertaining to the administering, prescribing, dispensing, or sale of
controlled substances or regulated chemicals designated under this chapter
without a warrant; and

(3) The administrator or any of the administrator's
agents may inventory any stock of any controlled substance or regulated
chemical designated under section 329-61 and secure samples or specimens of any
drug, device, or chemical not seized as evidence by paying or offering to pay
for the sample. The administrator shall make or cause to be made examinations
of samples secured under this section to determine whether or not this chapter
is being violated.

(b) An inspection of records authorized by
this section shall not extend to financial data relating to pricing of items
other than shipment and sale amounts, unless the owner, operator, or agent in
charge of the controlled premises consents in writing.

(c) For purposes of this section,
"controlled premises" means:

(1) Places where persons registered or exempted from
registration requirements under this chapter are required to keep records; and

(2) Places, including factories, warehouses,
establishments, and conveyances in which persons registered or exempted from
registration requirements under this chapter are permitted to hold,
manufacture, compound, process, sell, dispense, deliver, conduct chemical
analysis, or otherwise dispose of any controlled substance or regulated
chemical designated under section 329-61. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1; gen ch 1985;
am L 1990, c 281, §10; am L 2009, c 117, §7; am L 2016, c 218, §13]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next